da: Impedans i subwooferens svingspole i motorkøretøj (pr. spole): 1 ohm; 2 ohm; 4 ohm; 8 ohm; Andet
de: Impedanz der Schwingspule des Kfz-Subwoofers (pro Spule): 1 Ohm; 2 Ohm; 4 Ohm; 8 Ohm; Sonstige
ru: Сопротивление звуковой катушки автомобильного сабвуфера (на катушку): 1 Ом; 2 Ом; 4 Ом; 8 Ом; Другое
zh-TW: 汽車重低音喇叭音圈阻抗（每個音圈）: 1 歐姆; 2 歐姆; 4 歐姆; 8 歐姆; 其他
vi: Trở kháng cuộn dây loa siêu trầm xe hơi (mỗi cuộn dây): 1 ohm; 2 ohm; 4 ohm; 8 ohm; Khác
sv: Impedans för talspole i motorfordon (per spole): 1 ohm; 2 ohm; 4 ohm; 8 ohm; Övrigt
pt-BR: Veículo automotor subwoofer impedância da bobina de voz (por bobina): 1 ohm; 2 ohms; 4 ohms; 8 ohms; Outros
en: Motor vehicle subwoofer voice coil impedance (per coil): 1 ohm; 2 ohm; 4 ohm; 8 ohm; Other
es: Impedancia de la bobina móvil del subwoofer del vehículo a motor (por bobina): 1 ohmio; 2 ohmios; 4 ohmios; 8 ohmios; Otro
ko: 자동차 서브우퍼 보이스 코일 임피던스(코일당): 1옴; 2옴; 4옴; 8옴; 기타
zh-CN: 机动车低音炮音圈阻抗（每个音圈）: 1 欧姆; 2 欧姆; 4 欧姆; 8 欧姆; 其他
it: Impedenza della bobina mobile del subwoofer per veicoli a motore (per bobina): 1 ohm; 2 ohm; 4 ohm; 8 ohm; Altro
th: ค่าความต้านทานของขดลวดเสียงซับวูฟเฟอร์ในรถยนต์ (ต่อขดลวด): 1 โอห์ม; 2 โอห์ม; 4 โอห์ม; 8 โอห์ม; อื่นๆ
el: Σύνθετη αντίσταση πηνίου φωνής υπογούφερ μηχανοκίνητου οχήματος (ανά πηνίο): 1 ohm; 2 ohm; 4 ohm; 8 ohm; Άλλο
pl: Impedancja cewki drgającej subwoofera pojazdu silnikowego (na cewkę): 1 om; 2 omy; 4 omy; 8 omów; Inne
cs: Impedance měniče subwooferu motorového vozidla (na cívku): 1 ohm; 2 ohmy; 4 ohmy; 8 ohmů; Jiné
lt-LT: Motorinės transporto priemonės žemųjų dažnių garsiakalbio balso ritės varža (vienai ritei): 1 omas; 2 omai; 4 omai; 8 omai; Kita
tr: Motorlu taşıt subwoofer ses bobini empedansı (bobin başına): 1 ohm; 2 ohm; 4 ohm; 8 ohm; Diğer
nl: Motorvoertuig subwoofer spreekspoel impedantie (per spoel): 1 ohm; 2 ohm; 4 ohm; 8 ohm; Overig
bg-BG: Импеданс на звуковата бобина на субуфера за моторно превозно средство (на бобина): 1 ом; 2 ома; 4 ома; 8 ома; Друго
fr: Impédance de la bobine mobile du haut-parleur de grave du véhicule (par bobine): 1 ohm; 2 ohms; 4 ohms; 8 ohms; Autre
fi: Moottoriajoneuvon subwooferin puhekelan impedanssi (kelaa kohden): 1 ohm; 2 ohm; 4 ohm; 8 ohm; Muu
ro-RO: Impedanța bobinei vocale a subwooferului autovehiculului (per bobină): 1 ohm; 2 ohmi; 4 ohmi; 8 ohmi; Altele
hu: Gépjármű mélynyomóhangtekercsének impedanciája (tekercsenként): 1 ohm; 2 ohm; 4 ohm; 8 ohm; Egyéb
hr-HR: Impedancija zvučne zavojnice subwoofera motornog vozila (po zavojnici): 1 om; 2 oma; 4 oma; 8 oma; Ostalo
sl-SI: Impedanca zvočne tuljave nizkotonca motornega vozila (na tuljavo): 1 ohm; 2 ohma; 4 ohmi; 8 ohmov; Drugo
sk-SK: Impedancia hlasovej cievky subwoofera v motorovom vozidle (na jednu cievku): 1 ohm; 2 ohmy; 4 ohmy; 8 ohmov; Iné
nb: Impedans for talespole for subwoofer i motorkjøretøy (per spole): 1 ohm; 2 ohm; 4 ohm; 8 ohm; Annet
pt-PT: Impedância da bobina de voz do subwoofer de um veículo automóvel (por bobina): 1 ohm; 2 ohms; 4 ohms; 8 ohms; Outro
ja: 自動車用サブウーファーのボイスコイルインピーダンス（コイル1個あたり）: 1オーム; 2オーム; 4オーム; 8オーム; その他